Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 35.155, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Importation. (a) A person must not import live Cervidae into the state from a state or province where chronic wasting disease has been detected in the farmed or wild cervid population in the last five years unless the animal has tested not detected for chronic wasting disease with a validated live-animal test. (b) Live Cervidae or Cervidae semen must originate from a herd that has been subject to a state-, federal-, or provincial-approved chronic wasting disease herd certification program and that has reached a status equivalent to the highest certification. (c) Cervidae imported in violation of this section may be seized and destroyed by the commissioner of natural resources. (d) This subdivision does not apply to the interstate transfer of animals between two facilities accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariumsnew text begin or between a facility accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums and a facility that:new text end new text begin (1) is a United States Department of Agriculture-licensed exhibitor of regulated animals; new text end new text begin (2) houses animals owned by institutions accredited by the American Zoo and Aquarium Association; and new text end new text begin (3) participates in the American Zoo and Aquarium Association Species Survival Plannew text end . (e) Notwithstanding this subdivision, the commissioner of natural resources may issue a permit allowing the importation of orphaned wild cervid species that are not susceptible to chronic wasting disease from another state to an Association of Zoos and Aquariums accredited institution in Minnesota following a joint risk-based assessment conducted by the commissioner and the institution.